Georgia, session 2025_26, HB432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 27 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
hunting, trapping, or fishing, is amended in Code Section 27-2-3, relating to effective periods
of hunting, fishing, and trapping licenses generally and multiyear licenses, by revising
subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided, all hunting, fishing, and trapping licenses,
including without limitation commercial fishing and commercial fishing boat licenses
issued pursuant to Code Section 27-2-8, shall be effective from April 1 to March 31 of the
following year; except that all annual, two-year, or other multiyear hunting, fishing, and
hunting and fishing combination licenses issued pursuant to paragraphs (1) through (4) of
Code Section 27-2-23 shall be effective through the applicable one-year, two-year, or
H. B. 432 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 44 3118S
multiyear anniversary of the date of issuance. If a person possesses a valid annual,
two-year, or other multiyear hunting, fishing, or hunting and fishing combination license
at the time of sale of one or more annual, two-year, or other multiyear licenses with
identical privileges to the valid license, the new license or licenses shall become effective
when the original license expires and shall remain valid through the full applicable period.
The department may specify the effective dates and term of the following licenses or
permits:
(1) The Georgia waterfowl and migratory bird stamp to meet requirements of Code
Section 27-2-20;
(2) The free Georgia salt water fishing endorsement to meet requirements of Code
Section 27-2-20.1; and
(3) Any permit or requirement authorized by Code Section 27-3-29 regarding harvest
recording and reporting; and
(4) The Georgia turkey permit to meet requirements of Code Section 27-2-6."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 27-2-6, relating to trout license, Georgia
waterfowl and migratory bird stamp, big game license, and alligator harvest permit, by
adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(g)(1) Effective July 1, 2026, it shall be unlawful for any person 16 years of age or older
to hunt turkey in this state unless such person has a Georgia turkey permit in his or her
possession in addition to all other required hunting licenses. Any resident of this state
may be issued a Georgia turkey permit at no cost, and the fee for such permit for
nonresidents shall be $100.00.
(2) By July 1, 2026, the department shall design and sell a collectible Georgia turkey
stamp. Purchase of such turkey stamp shall be voluntary and shall not be required in
order to hunt turkeys in this state. The board shall be authorized to promulgate rules and
H. B. 432 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 44 3118S
regulations to administer this subsection and shall establish appropriate fees for the
collectible Georgia turkey stamp.
(3) Any fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be retained by the department
pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-12-92.1."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 27-2-23, relating to license, permit, tag, and
stamp fees, by adding new subparagraphs to paragraph (1) to read as follows:
"(N) Resident Georgia turkey permit Annual 0.00
(O) Nonresident Georgia turkey permit Annual 100.00"
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 432 (SUB)
- 3 -